dev/gsoc2011/monodix/proper-noun/proper-noun.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="enclitic">
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ই -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ই</l>
          <r><j/>ই<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- ও -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r><j/>ও<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="হক__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="নাসা__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ড__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="মালি__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="যুবদল__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="চীন__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="লা__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ঢাকা__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="চে__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="দি__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="আরা__np_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="বেগম__np_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="মোরশেদ"><i>মোরশেদ</i><par n="ড__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিএসএফ"><i>বিএসএফ</i><par n="যুবদল__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বঙ্গোপসাগর"><i>বঙ্গোপসাগর</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লেসোথো"><i>লেসোথো</i><par n="মালি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কানাডা"><i>কানাডা</i><par n="ঢাকা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হান্নান"><i>হান্নান</i><par n="ড__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাসান"><i>হাসান</i><par n="হক__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মির্জা"><i>মির্জা</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্র্যাক"><i>ব্র্যাক</i><par n="যুবদল__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অদিতি"><i>অদিতি</i><par n="আরা__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বলিউড"><i>বলিউড</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সিন্ধু"><i>সিন্ধু</i><par n="মালি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আফরিন"><i>আফরিন</i><par n="বেগম__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্পত্তি"><i>সম্পত্তি</i><par n="চে__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গাইবান্ধা"><i>গাইবান্ধা</i><par n="ঢাকা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আরিফ"><i>আরিফ</i><par n="ড__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্যারাগুয়ে"><i>প্যারাগুয়ে</i><par n="মালি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শাহজাহান"><i>শাহজাহান</i><par n="হক__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="নাইজার"><i>নাইজার</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইসমাইল"><i>ইসমাইল</i><par n="ড__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সামোয়া"><i>সামোয়া</i><par n="ঢাকা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আহলে"><i>আহলে</i><par n="দি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জয়ন্তী"><i>জয়ন্তী</i><par n="আরা__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বেইজিং"><i>বেইজিং</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মলদোভা"><i>মলদোভা</i><par n="ঢাকা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রহমান"><i>রহমান</i><par n="হক__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="মন্টিনিগ্রো"><i>মন্টিনিগ্রো</i><par n="মালি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বেগম"><i>বেগম</i><par n="বেগম__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="কালা"><i>কালা</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="আনসার"><i>আনসার</i><par n="যুবদল__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কম্বোডিয়া"><i>কম্বোডিয়া</i><par n="ঢাকা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লিভারপুল"><i>লিভারপুল</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="খায়রুল"><i>খায়রুল</i><par n="হক__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ফরাসি"><i>ফরাসি</i><par n="চে__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শহীদুল্লাহ"><i>শহীদুল্লাহ</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="খানম"><i>খানম</i><par n="বেগম__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="স্কয়ার"><i>স্কয়ার</i><par n="যুবদল__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বোয়ালমারী"><i>বোয়ালমারী</i><par n="মালি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সোনিয়া"><i>সোনিয়া</i><par n="আরা__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="খান্না"><i>খান্না</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সাফটা"><i>সাফটা</i><par n="নাসা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চেলসি"><i>চেলসি</i><par n="দি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রুশ"><i>রুশ</i><par n="ড__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিরিন"><i>শিরিন</i><par n="বেগম__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="মওলানা"><i>মওলানা</i><par n="হক__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ইহুদি"><i>ইহুদি</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="বিয়ানীবাজার"><i>বিয়ানীবাজার</i><par n="চীন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গাজা"><i>গাজা</i><par n="ঢাকা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইংরেজী"><i>ইংরেজী</i><par n="দি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইতালীয়"><i>ইতালীয়</i><par n="চে__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্রাহ্ম"><i>ব্রাহ্ম</i><par n="নাসা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আর্সেনাল"><i>আর্সেনাল</i><par n="যুবদল__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডায়ানা"><i>ডায়ানা</i><par n="আরা__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="এমএ"><i>এমএ</i><par n="দি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডেনীয়"><i>ডেনীয়</i><par n="চে__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মরিনহো"><i>মরিনহো</i><par n="লা__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="জাভা"><i>জাভা</i><par n="নাসা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফায়ারফক্স"><i>ফায়ারফক্স</i><par n="যুবদল__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কঙ্গো"><i>কঙ্গো</i><par n="মালি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আজারবাইজানি"><i>আজারবাইজানি</i><par n="চে__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মিশেল"><i>মিশেল</i><par n="বেগম__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="বসাক"><i>বসাক</i><par n="ড__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কৃত্তিবাস"><i>কৃত্তিবাস</i><par n="হক__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ইসলামি"><i>ইসলামি</i><par n="দি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বার্সেলোনা"><i>বার্সেলোনা</i><par n="নাসা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সিমি"><i>সিমি</i><par n="আরা__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ইয়াবা"><i>ইয়াবা</i><par n="নাসা__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভিয়েতনামীয়"><i>ভিয়েতনামীয়</i><par n="চে__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তবলা"><i>তবলা</i><par n="নাসা__np_mf"/></e>
